Utah statutes.
19-6-414.   Grounds for revocation of certificate of compliance and ineligibility for payment of costs from fund.

(1)  If the executive secretary determines that any of the requirements of Subsection 19-6-412(2) and Section 19-6-413 have not been met, the executive secretary shall notify the owner or operator by certified mail that:

(a)  his certificate of compliance may be revoked;

(b)  if he is participating in the program, he is violating the eligibility requirements for the fund; and

(c)  he shall demonstrate his compliance with this part within 60 days after receipt of the notification or his certificate of compliance will be revoked and if participating in the program he will be ineligible to receive payment for claims against the fund.

(2)  If the executive secretary determines the owner's or operator's compliance problems have not been resolved within 60 days after receipt of the notification in Subsection (1), the executive secretary shall send written notice to the owner or operator that the owner's or operator's certificate of compliance is revoked and he is no longer eligible for payment of costs from the fund.

(3)  Revocation of certificates of compliance may be appealed to the executive director.

